Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COUNTY REIMBURSEMENT.new text end new text begin The attorney general must reimburse Mille Lacs County $7,800,000 for litigation costs incurred prior to 2024 to defend the lawsuit, Mille Lacs Band of Ojibwe, et al. v. County of Mille Lacs, Minnesota, et al., Case No. 17-CV-05155, and all appeals from that suit. The payment must be made by June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the attorney general to make the payment required in section 1. new text end